Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2027.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 45-576.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE45-576.09. Active management areas; director's authority to change assured water supply rules Notwithstanding any other law, the director may revise the rules adopted pursuant to section 45-576, subsection H to apply section 45-576.08 to other active management areas. the director may not adopt rules to apply section 45-576.08 to a city or town in the Phoenix active MANAGEMENT area that has received a DESIGNATION of assured water supply PURSUANT to section 45-576, subsection e. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Phoenix active management area; designation of assured water supply; review Within thirty days after the effective date of this act, the director of the department of water resources shall review the physical availability of groundwater and stored water of each city or town in the Phoenix active management area that has received a designation of assured water supply pursuant to section 45-576, subsection E, Arizona Revised Statutes, and section 45-576.09, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act.